Utah statutes.
53B-6-104.   Multi-University Consortium for Teacher Training in Sensory
Impairments -- Purposes -- Appropriation.
(1) (a)  In conjunction with the State Board of Regents' master plan for
higher education, there is established a Multi-University Consortium for
Teacher Training in Sensory Impairments which is an outgrowth of a consortium
established by the federal government.
(b)  The consortium shall include within its membership the University of
Utah, Utah State University, Brigham Young University, the Utah Schools for
the Deaf and the Blind, the Services for At-Risk Students section of the State
Office of Education, and local school districts.
(2)  The consortium, in collaboration with the State Board of Regents and the
State Board of Education, shall develop and implement teacher preparation
programs that qualify and certify instructors to work with students who are
visually impaired, hearing impaired, or both visually and hearing impaired.
(3) (a)  There is appropriated from the General Fund for fiscal year 1994-95,
$200,000 to the State Board of Regents to fund the consortium's teacher
preparation programs referred to in Subsection (2).
(b)  The appropriation is nonlapsing.
(c)  The State Board of Regents shall consider including within its annual
budget recommendations a line item appropriation to provide ongoing funding
for the programs provided pursuant to this section.
